Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.015

Intent.

The legislature finds it necessary to regulate the practice of ocularist to protect the public health, safety, and welfare. The legislature intends that only individuals who meet and maintain minimum standards of competence and conduct may provide service to the public.

[ 1991 c 180 s 1.]